Wyoming, session 2025, HB0132.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-18-804 by creating new subsections
(w) and (y) is amended to read:
31-18-804. Permits for and certain highways to carry,
overweight and oversize vehicles; government vehicles.
(w) For movements of a vehicle meeting indivisible
load requirements, the director or his authorized
representative may issue permits for separate movements or
extended periods of movement effective for one (1) year
permitting hauling of prefabricated buildings, panels and
trusses. No permit issued under this subsection shall be
granted for any load of prefabricated buildings, panels or
trusses exceeding one hundred sixty-two (162) inches in
width and fifteen (15) feet in height. The fee for a one
(1) year permit under this subsection is four hundred
dollars ($400.00).
(y) The director or the director's authorized
representative may issue permits effective for one (1) year
that permit the hauling of forest products, baled hay or
combine headers. No permit issued under this subsection
shall be granted for any load of forest products exceeding
one hundred twelve (112) inches in width or any load of
baled hay or combine headers exceeding one hundred fifty
(150) inches in width and fifteen (15) feet in height. No
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0132
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
single component of the load may exceed one hundred two
(102) inches in width. The fee for a one (1) year permit
issued under this subsection shall be two hundred dollars
($200.00).
Section 2. The department of transportation shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0132
ENROLLED ACT NO. 22, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3